Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 16. Parties to Crime.

Collateral references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d, Criminal Law, §§ 161-175.

22 C.J.S., Criminal Law, §§ 164-188.

Coercion, compulsion or duress as defense to criminal prosecution, 40 ALR2d 903.

Who other than actor is liable for manslaughter, 95 ALR2d 175.

Woman upon whom abortion is committed or attempted as accomplice for purposes of rule requiring corroboration of accomplice testimony, 34 ALR3d 858.

Acquittal of principal or his conviction of lesser degree of offense as affecting prosecution of accessory and aider and abettor, 9 ALR4th 972.

Prosecution or conviction of one conspirator as affected by disposition of case against coconspirators, 19 ALR4th 192.

Disciplinary action against attorney for aiding or assisting another person in unauthorized practice of law, 41 ALR4th 361.

Homicide: physician's withdrawal of life supports from comatose patient,
47 ALR4th 18.

Criminal responsibility under 18 USCS 2(b) of one who lacks capacity to commit an offense but causes another to do so, 52 ALR Fed. 769.

Sec. 11.16.100.
Legal accountability based upon conduct.

A person is guilty of an offense if it is committed by the person’s own conduct or by the conduct of another for which the person is legally accountable under AS

11.16.110

, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “offense,” “conduct” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Legal accountability based upon the conduct of another: complicity - AS

11.16.110

Exemptions to legal accountability for conduct of another - AS

11.16.120

Hindering prosecution in the first and second degree - AS

11.56.770

,

11.56.780

Original Code Provisions - AS 11.10.010; 12.15.010

TD: II, 29-39

Sec. 11.16.110.
Legal accountability based upon the conduct of another.

A person is legally accountable for the conduct of another constituting an offense if

the person is made legally accountable by a provision of law defining the offense;

with intent to promote or facilitate the commission of the offense, the person

solicits the other to commit the offense; or

aids or abets the other in planning or committing the offense; or

acting with the culpable mental state that is sufficient for the commission of the offense, the person causes an innocent person or a person who lacks criminal responsibility to engage in the proscribed conduct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “culpable mental state,” “law,” “solicits” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Exemptions to legal accountability based upon the conduct of another — AS

11.16.120

Legal accountability of organizations — AS

11.16.130

Solicitation — AS

11.31.110

Original Code Provisions: AS 11.10.010, AS 12.15.010.

TD: II, 30-32.

Sec. 11.16.120.
Exemptions to legal accountability for conduct of another.

In a prosecution for an offense in which legal accountability is based on the conduct of another person,

it is an affirmative defense that the defendant, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of criminal intent,

terminated the defendant’s complicity before the commission of the offense;

wholly deprived the defendant’s complicity of its effectiveness in the commission of the offense; and

gave timely warning to law enforcement authorities or, if timely warning could not be given to law enforcement authorities by reasonable efforts, otherwise made a reasonable effort to prevent the commission of the offense;

it is not a defense that

the other person has not been prosecuted for or convicted of an offense based upon the conduct in question or has been convicted of a different offense or degree of offense;

the offense, as defined, can be committed only by a particular class of persons to which the defendant does not belong, and the defendant is for that reason legally incapable of committing the offense in an individual capacity; or

the other person is not guilty of the offense.

Except as otherwise provided by a provision of law defining an offense, a person is not legally accountable for the conduct of another constituting an offense if

the person is the victim of the offense; or

the offense is so defined that the person’s conduct is inevitably incidental to its commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “renunciation” which is not “voluntary and complete” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provisions - None.

TD: II, 32-35.

Sec. 11.16.130.
Legal accountability of organizations.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, an organization is legally accountable for conduct constituting an offense if the conduct

is the conduct of its agent and

within the scope of the agent’s employment and in behalf of the organization; or

is solicited, subsequently ratified, or subsequently adopted by the organization; or

consists of an omission to discharge a specific duty of affirmative performance imposed on organizations by law.

In this section “agent” means a director, officer, or employee of an organization or any other person who is authorized to act in behalf of the organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “organization,” “omission,” “law” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Authorized fines against organizations convicted of an offense - AS

12.55.035(c)

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: II, 35-37.

TD: II, 35-37.